Utah statutes.
11-44-201.   Political subdivision responsibilities -- State responsibilities.

(1)  A political subdivision may:

(a)  enter into an energy savings agreement;

(b)  develop and administer a facility energy efficiency program;

(c)  analyze energy consumption by the political subdivision;

(d)  designate a staff member who is responsible for a facility energy efficiency program; and

(e)  provide the governing body of the political subdivision with information regarding the facility energy efficiency program.

(2)  The following entities may provide information, technical resources, and other assistance to a political subdivision acting under this chapter:

(a)  the Utah Geological Survey, created in Section 79-3-201;

(b)  the State Board of Education, under Title 53A, Chapter 1, Administration of Public Education at the State Level;

(c)  the Division of Purchasing and General Services, created in Section 63A-2-101; and

(d)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, created in Section 63A-5-201.



Enacted by Chapter 244, 2010 General Session

